Washington statutes.
RCW 9.61.240

Telephone harassment—Permitting telephone to be used.

Any person who knowingly permits any telephone under his or her control to be used for any purpose prohibited by RCW 9.61.230 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 316; 1967 c 16 s 2.]